src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! !!!Noun inflection
! ---------------

!! Nenets nouns inflect in cases.


LEXICON N_ҢЭ-RUS 
+Rus: N_ҢЭ ;
LEXICON N_ҢЭ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ңэ:ңэ 1  ProsSg -вна
! no change in stem
! ңэ ŋæ     ңэн’ ŋæn°h	ңэˮ ŋæq	ңэ ŋæ
!! Yaml: __xo, ngaeTS__
: NMN_ҢЭ ;
LEXICON NMN_ҢЭ
 NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
! +Pl+Nom +Abs
! +Sg+Acc, +Sg+Gen, +Sg+Nom,
! +Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+Aor+ScSg3
! +Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+Aor+ScPl3
 NEW-AFF-2CENTERS-PRED-NOM_Даваˮ ;
 NEW-AFF-2CENTERS-PRED-NOM_Дваˮ ;
 NEW-AFF-3CENTERS-EQU_Дремʼ ;
 NEW-AFF-2CENTERS-CLOSED-PRED-ACC/GEN_Дамда ;
 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дами ;
 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дми ;
! +Pred+Acc+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg, PxDu1, PxPl1
! +Pred+Gen+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg, PxDu1, PxPl1
! +Pred+Nom+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg, +PxSg3, PxDu. PxPl.
 NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Каʼ ;
 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
 NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
 NEW-SG-PROS_вна ;
 NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮVмна ;

LEXICON N_ҢЭ-Pal/Var  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ңэ:ңэ 1  ProsSg -вна
! no change in stem
! ңэ ŋæ     ңэн’ ŋæn°h	ңэˮ ŋæq	ңэ ŋæ
!! Yaml: __nyeTS__
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
: NEW-AFF-2CENTERS-PRED-NOM_Даваˮ ;
: NEW-AFF-2CENTERS-PRED-NOM_Дваˮ ;
: NEW-AFF-3CENTERS-EQU_Дремʼ ;
: NEW-AFF-2CENTERS-CLOSED-PRED-ACC/GEN_Дамда ;
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дами ;
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дми ;
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Каʼ ;
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SG-LOC_Каня ; !pal/var
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS_Дё ; !pal/var
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
: NEW-SG-PROS_вна ;
: NEW-SG-PROS_вня ; !pal/var
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮVмна ;
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮVмня ; !pal/var

LEXICON N_Ё  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ я:я 2 ProsSg -вна
!! Yaml: __ya, yaTS__
! /total=3/
! я ya	ян’ yan°h	яˮ yaq	ё yo
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
! +Pl+Nom +Abs
! +Sg+Acc, +Sg+Gen, +Sg+Nom,
! +Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+Aor+ScSg3
! +Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+Aor+ScPl3
: NEW-AFF-2CENTERS-PRED-NOM_Даваˮ ;
: NEW-AFF-3CENTERS-EQU_Даремʼ ;
: NEW-AFF-2CENTERS-PRED-NOM_Дваˮ ;
: NEW-AFF-3CENTERS-EQU_Дремʼ ;
: NEW-AFF-2CENTERS-CLOSED-PRED-ACC/GEN_Дамда ;
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дами ;
: NEW-AFF-2CENTERS-CLOSED-PRED-ACC/GEN_Дмда ;
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дми ;

: NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Каʼ ;
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
: NEW-SG-PROS_вна ;
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
:%^A2O NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
! +Pl+Acc X +Abs +PxSg. +PxDu. +PxPl.
! +Pl+Gen X +Abs +PxSg. +PxDu. +PxPl.
! +Pl+Nom X +PxSg. +PxDu. +PxPl.
! +Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Cop+Ind+Aor+ScPl3
! +Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Cop+Ind+Aor+ScPl3

:%^A2O NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮVмна ;
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮVмна ;

LEXICON N_ПИ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ пя:пя 3 ProsSg -вна
!! Yaml: __N-pyaTS__
! /total=3/
! пя pya	пян’ pyan°h	пяˮ pyaq	пи pyí
!: NMN_ПИ ;
!: NMN_МУНО ;
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
: NEW-AFF-2CENTERS-PRED-NOM_Даваˮ ;
: NEW-AFF-2CENTERS-PRED-NOM_Дваˮ ;
: NEW-AFF-3CENTERS-EQU_Дремʼ ;
: NEW-AFF-2CENTERS-CLOSED-PRED-ACC/GEN_Дамда ;
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дами ;
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дми ;
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Каʼ ;
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
: NEW-SG-PROS_вна ;
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
:%^A2I NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ; !PLACCSUF_Zero
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮVмна ;

LEXICON N_ТЫ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ты: 4 ProsSg -вна
!! Yaml: __tyTS__
! /total=4/
! ты ti	тэ̇н’ ten°h	тыˮ tiq	ты tí
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
:%^VowLower NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS ;
:%^VowLower NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Каʼ ;
:%^VowLower NEW-ODD-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
:%^VowLower NEW-SG-PROS_вна ;
:%^VowLower NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;

: NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ; !PLACCSUF_Zero
:%^VowLower NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮVмна ;



LEXICON N_ХАВО  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ха: 5 ProsSg -вна
!! Yaml: __tyTS__
! /total=1/
! ха xa	хан’ xan°h	хаˮ xaq	хаво xawo
!: NMN_ХАВО ;
!: NMN_МУНО ;
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
: NEW-AFF-2CENTERS-PRED-NOM_Даваˮ ;
: NEW-AFF-3CENTERS-EQU_Даремʼ ;
: NEW-AFF-2CENTERS-PRED-NOM_Дваˮ ;
: NEW-AFF-3CENTERS-EQU_Дремʼ ;
: NEW-AFF-2CENTERS-CLOSED-PRED-ACC/GEN_Дамда ;
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дами ;
: NEW-AFF-2CENTERS-CLOSED-PRED-ACC/GEN_Дмда ;
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дми ;

: NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Каʼ ;
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
: NEW-SG-PROS_вна ;
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
!:во MUNO_O ; 
:во NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
:во NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮVмна ;


LEXICON N_СЁЁ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ сё: 6 ProsSg -вна
! /total=0/
!= * Yaml: __syoyoTS__
! сё syo	сён’ syon°h	сёˮ syoq	сёё syoyo
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
: NEW-AFF-2CENTERS-PRED-NOM_Даваˮ ;
: NEW-AFF-2CENTERS-PRED-NOM_Дваˮ ;
: NEW-AFF-3CENTERS-EQU_Дремʼ ;
: NEW-AFF-2CENTERS-CLOSED-PRED-ACC/GEN_Дамда ;
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дами ;
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дми ;
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Каʼ ;
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
: NEW-SG-PROS_вна ;
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
:ё NEW-EVEN-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
:ё NEW-EVEN-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮмана ;
:е NEW-EVEN-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
:е NEW-EVEN-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮмана ;


LEXICON N_ИБЕ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ и: 7 ProsSg -вна
! /total=0/
! и yí	ин’ yín°h	иˮ yíq	ибе yíbye
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
: NEW-EVEN-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS ;
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Каʼ ;
: NEW-EVEN-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
: NEW-SG-PROS_вна ;
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
:бе NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
:бе NEW-EVEN-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮмана ;

LEXICON N_ХАБИЕ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ хӑби:8ProsSg -вна
! /total=0/
! хӑби xəbyi	хӑбин’ xəbyin°h	хӑбиˮ xəbyiq	хӑбие xəbyiy
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
: NEW-EVEN-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS ;
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Каʼ ;
: NEW-EVEN-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
: NEW-SG-PROS_вна ;
: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
:е NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
:е NEW-EVEN-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮмана ;

LEXICON N_ПАНЫ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ пӑны:пӑн 9 ы!ProsSg -(э)вна
! /total=30/
! пӑны pəni°	пӑнэн’ pənen°h	пӑныˮ pəni°q	пӑны pəni°
:° NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
:° NEW-EVEN-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS ;
:° NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Каʼ ;
:° NEW-EVEN-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
:у NEW-SG-PROS_вна ;
:° NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
:%^VowLower NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
:%^VowLower NEW-EVEN-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮмана ;


LEXICON N_ХУСУВЭЙ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ хусувэй: 10 ProsSg -ювна
! /total=17/
! хусувэй xusuwey°	хусувэн’ xusuwen°h	хусувэйˮ xusuwey°q	хусувэй xusuwey°
:° NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
:° NEW-EVEN-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS ;
:° NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Каʼ ;
:° NEW-EVEN-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
:у NEW-SG-PROS_вна ;
:° NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
:° NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
:° NEW-EVEN-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮмана ;


LEXICON N_ХАНО  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ хӑн: 11P ProsSg -увна
!! Yaml: __xano__
! /total=27/
! хӑн xən°	хӑнӑн’ xənən°h	хӑнˮ xən°q	хӑно xəno
: NMN_ХАНО ;
LEXICON NMN_ХАНО
:° NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
:° NEW-EVEN-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS ;
:° NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Каʼ ;
:° NEW-EVEN-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
:у NEW-SG-PROS_вна ;
:° NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
:о NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
:о NEW-EVEN-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮмана ;


LEXICON N_ХАНО-SG
: NMN_ХАНО-SG ;
LEXICON N_ХАНО-PL
: NMN_ХАНО-PL ;

LEXICON N_ТИРЕ-RUS  
+Rus: N_ТИРЕ ;
